Illinois, session 104th, SB3222.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Public Utilities Act is amended by changing 5Section 22-501 and by adding Section 22-504 as follows: 6    (220 ILCS 5/22-501)7    Sec. 22-501. Customer service and privacy protection. All 8cable or video providers in this State shall comply with the 9following customer service requirements and privacy 10protections. The provisions of this Act shall not apply to an 11incumbent cable operator prior to January 1, 2008. For 12purposes of this paragraph, an incumbent cable operator means 13a person or entity that provided cable services in a 14particular area under a franchise agreement with a local unit 15of government pursuant to Section 11-42-11 of the Illinois 16Municipal Code or Section 5-1095 of the Counties Code on 17January 1, 2007. A master antenna television, satellite master 18antenna television, direct broadcast satellite, multipoint 19distribution service, and other provider of video programming 20shall only be subject to the provisions of this Article to the 21extent permitted by federal law. 22    The following definitions apply to the terms used in this 23Article:  SB3222 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 19119 AAS 32564 b1    "Basic cable or video service" means any service offering 2or tier that includes the retransmission of local television 3broadcast signals.4    "Cable or video provider" means any person or entity 5providing cable service or video service pursuant to 6authorization under (i) the Cable and Video Competition Law of 72007; (ii) Section 11-42-11 of the Illinois Municipal Code; 8(iii) Section 5-1095 of the Counties Code; or (iv) a master 9antenna television, satellite master antenna television, 10direct broadcast satellite, multipoint distribution services, 11and other providers of video programming, whatever their 12technology. A cable or video provider shall not include a 13landlord providing only broadcast video programming to a 14single-family home or other residential dwelling consisting of 154 units or less.16    "Franchise" has the same meaning as found in 47 U.S.C. 17522(9).18    "Local unit of government" means a city, village, 19incorporated town, or a county.20    "Long-form content" means a film, show, or other video 21programming that is the primary material a user of a video 22streaming service consumes on the platform of that service. 23    "Normal business hours" means those hours during which 24most similar businesses in the geographic area of the local 25unit of government are open to serve customers. In all cases, 26"normal business hours" must include some evening hours at   SB3222 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 19119 AAS 32564 b1least one night per week or some weekend hours.2    "Normal operating conditions" means those service 3conditions that are within the control of cable or video 4providers. Those conditions that are not within the control of 5cable or video providers include, but are not limited to, 6natural disasters, civil disturbances, power outages, 7telephone network outages, and severe or unusual weather 8conditions. Those conditions that are ordinarily within the 9control of cable or video providers include, but are not 10limited to, special promotions, pay-per-view events, rate 11increases, regular peak or seasonal demand periods, and 12maintenance or upgrade of the cable service or video service 13network.14    "Normalization" means adjusting the audio of short-form 15content by measuring and scaling the average loudness of the 16audio to match the target loudness of the audio of the 17accompanying long-form content distributed by a video 18streaming service or third-party advertising manager 19consistent with established industry standards, such as the 20Advanced Television Systems Committee's Recommended Practice 21A/85, Techniques for Establishing and Maintaining Audio 22Loudness for Digital Television. 23    "Service interruption" means the loss of picture or sound 24on one or more cable service or video service on one or more 25cable or video channels.26    "Service line drop" means the point of connection between   SB3222 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 19119 AAS 32564 b1a premises and the cable or video network that enables the 2premises to receive cable service or video service.3    "Short-form content" means commercial advertising, 4promotional, and public service-related video programming that 5is interspersed in long-form content on a video streaming 6service.7    "Third-party advertising manager" means an entity that 8manages the distribution of short-form content on a video 9streaming service and can adjust the loudness of such 10short-form content. 11    "Video programming" has the meaning given to that term in 12Section 613(h) of Title 47 of the United States Code.13    "Video streaming service" means an entity that makes 14available directly to the consumer, through a distribution 15method that uses Internet protocol, either of the following: 16(1) video programming or (2) video content the entity makes 17available for users to view. "Video streaming service" does 18not include a cable or video provider, an entity that serves 19video programming or video content without commercial 20advertisements, or a website or application that does not 21stream video programming to consumers as its primary purpose.22    (a) General customer service standards:23        (1) Cable or video providers shall establish general 24    standards related to customer service, which shall 25    include, but not be limited to, installation, 26    disconnection, service and repair obligations; appointment   SB3222 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 19119 AAS 32564 b1    hours and employee ID requirements; customer service 2    telephone numbers and hours; procedures for billing, 3    charges, deposits, refunds, and credits; procedures for 4    termination of service; notice of deletion of programming 5    service; changes related to transmission of programming; 6    changes or increases in rates; the use and availability of 7    parental control or lock-out devices; the use and 8    availability of an A/B switch if applicable; complaint 9    procedures and procedures for bill dispute resolution; a 10    description of the rights and remedies available to 11    consumers if the cable or video provider does not 12    materially meet its customer service standards; and 13    special services for customers with visual, hearing, or 14    mobility disabilities.15        (2) Cable or video providers' rates for each level of 16    service, rules, regulations, and policies related to its 17    cable service or video service described in paragraph (1) 18    of this subsection (a) must be made available to the 19    public and displayed clearly and conspicuously on the 20    cable or video provider's site on the Internet. If a 21    promotional price or a price for a specified period of 22    time is offered, the cable or video provider shall display 23    the price at the end of the promotional period or 24    specified period of time clearly and conspicuously with 25    the display of the promotional price or price for a 26    specified period of time. The cable or video provider   SB3222 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 19119 AAS 32564 b1    shall provide this information upon request.2        (3) Cable or video providers shall provide notice 3    concerning their general customer service standards to all 4    customers. This notice shall be offered when service is 5    first activated and upon request thereafter. The 6    information in the notice shall also be available on the 7    cable or video providers' websites and shall include all 8    of the information specified in paragraph (1) of this 9    subsection (a), as well as the following: a listing of 10    services offered by the cable or video providers, which 11    shall clearly describe programming for all services and 12    all levels of service; the rates for all services and 13    levels of service; a telephone number through which 14    customers may subscribe to, change, or terminate service, 15    request customer service, or seek general or billing 16    information; instructions on the use of the cable or video 17    services; and a description of rights and remedies that 18    the cable or video providers shall make available to their 19    customers if they do not materially meet the general 20    customer service standards described in this Act.21    (b) General customer service obligations:22        (1) Cable or video providers shall render reasonably 23    efficient service, promptly make repairs, and interrupt 24    service only as necessary and for good cause, during 25    periods of minimum use of the system and for no more than 26    24 hours.  SB3222 Engrossed- 7 -LRB104 19119 AAS 32564 b1        (2) All service representatives or any other person 2    who contacts customers or potential customers on behalf of 3    the cable or video provider shall have a visible 4    identification card with their name and photograph and 5    shall orally identify themselves upon first contact with 6    the customer. Customer service representatives shall 7    orally identify themselves to callers immediately 8    following the greeting during each telephone contact with 9    the public.10        (3) The cable or video providers shall: (i) maintain a 11    customer service facility within the boundaries of a local 12    unit of government staffed by customer service 13    representatives that have the capacity to accept payment, 14    adjust bills, and respond to repair, installation, 15    reconnection, disconnection, or other service calls and 16    distribute or receive converter boxes, remote control 17    units, digital stereo units, or other equipment related to 18    the provision of cable or video service; (ii) provide 19    customers with bill payment facilities through retail, 20    financial, or other commercial institutions located within 21    the boundaries of a local unit of government; (iii) 22    provide an address, toll-free telephone number or 23    electronic address to accept bill payments and 24    correspondence and provide secure collection boxes for the 25    receipt of bill payments and the return of equipment, 26    provided that if a cable or video provider provides secure   SB3222 Engrossed- 8 -LRB104 19119 AAS 32564 b1    collection boxes, it shall provide a printed receipt when 2    items are deposited; or (iv) provide an address, toll-free 3    telephone number, or electronic address to accept bill 4    payments and correspondence and provide a method for 5    customers to return equipment to the cable or video 6    provider at no cost to the customer.7        (4) In each contact with a customer, the service 8    representatives or any other person who contacts customers 9    or potential customers on behalf of the cable or video 10    provider shall state the estimated cost of the service, 11    repair, or installation orally prior to delivery of the 12    service or before any work is performed, shall provide the 13    customer with an oral statement of the total charges 14    before terminating the telephone call or other contact in 15    which a service is ordered, whether in-person or over the 16    Internet, and shall provide a written statement of the 17    total charges before leaving the location at which the 18    work was performed. In the event that the cost of service 19    is a promotional price or is for a limited period of time, 20    the cost of service at the end of the promotion or limited 21    period of time shall be disclosed.22        (5) Cable or video providers shall provide customers a 23    minimum of 30 days' written notice before increasing rates 24    or eliminating transmission of programming and shall 25    submit the notice of any rate increase to the local unit of 26    government in advance of distribution to customers,   SB3222 Engrossed- 9 -LRB104 19119 AAS 32564 b1    provided that the cable or video provider is not in 2    violation of this provision if the elimination of 3    transmission of programming was outside the control of the 4    provider, in which case the provider shall use reasonable 5    efforts to provide as much notice as possible, and any 6    rate decrease related to the elimination of transmission 7    of programming shall be applied to the date of the change.8        (6) Cable or video providers shall provide clear 9    visual and audio reception that meets or exceeds 10    applicable Federal Communications Commission technical 11    standards. If a customer experiences poor video or audio 12    reception due to the equipment of the cable or video 13    provider, the cable or video provider shall promptly 14    repair the problem at its own expense.15    (c) Bills, payment, and termination:16        (1) Cable or video providers shall render monthly 17    bills that are clear, accurate, and understandable.18        (2) Every residential customer who pays bills directly 19    to the cable or video provider shall have at least 28 days 20    from the date of the bill to pay the listed charges.21        (3) Customer payments shall be posted promptly. When 22    the payment is sent by United States mail, payment is 23    considered paid on the date it is postmarked.24        (4) Cable or video providers may not terminate 25    residential service for nonpayment of a bill unless the 26    cable or video provider furnishes notice of the   SB3222 Engrossed- 10 -LRB104 19119 AAS 32564 b1    delinquency and impending termination at least 15 days 2    prior to the proposed termination. Notice of proposed 3    termination shall be mailed, postage prepaid, to the 4    customer to whom service is billed. Notice of proposed 5    termination shall not be mailed until the 24th day after 6    the date of the bill for services. Notice of delinquency 7    and impending termination may be part of a billing 8    statement only if the notice is designed to be 9    conspicuous. The cable or video providers may not assess a 10    late fee prior to the 24th day after the date of the bill 11    for service.12        (5) Every notice of impending termination shall 13    include all of the following: the name and address of 14    customer; the amount of the delinquency; the date on which 15    payment is required to avoid termination; and the 16    telephone number of the cable or video provider's service 17    representative to make payment arrangements and to provide 18    additional information about the charges for failure to 19    return equipment and for reconnection, if any.20        (6) Service may only be terminated on days when the 21    customer is able to reach a service representative of the 22    cable or video providers, either in person or by 23    telephone.24        (7) Any service terminated by a cable or video 25    provider without good cause shall be restored without any 26    reconnection fee, charge, or penalty; good cause for   SB3222 Engrossed- 11 -LRB104 19119 AAS 32564 b1    termination includes, but is not limited to, failure to 2    pay a bill by the date specified in the notice of impending 3    termination, payment by check for which there are 4    insufficient funds, theft of service, abuse of equipment 5    or personnel, or other similar subscriber actions.6        (8) Cable or video providers shall cease charging a 7    customer for any or all services within one business day 8    after it receives a request to immediately terminate 9    service or on the day requested by the customer if such a 10    date is at least 5 days from the date requested by the 11    customer. Nothing in this subsection (c) shall prohibit 12    the provider from billing for charges that the customer 13    incurs prior to the date of termination. Cable or video 14    providers shall issue a credit no later than the 15    customer's next billing cycle following the determination 16    that a credit is warranted. Cable or video providers shall 17    issue a refund or return a deposit promptly, but not later 18    than either the customer's next billing cycle following 19    resolution of the request or 30 days, whichever is 20    earlier, or the return of equipment, if any, whichever is 21    later.22        (9) The customers or subscribers of a cable or video 23    provider shall be allowed to disconnect their service at 24    any time within the first 30 days after subscribing to or 25    upgrading the service. Within this 30-day period, cable or 26    video providers shall not charge or impose any fees or   SB3222 Engrossed- 12 -LRB104 19119 AAS 32564 b1    penalties on the customer for disconnecting service, 2    including, but not limited to, any installation charge or 3    the imposition of an early termination charge, except the 4    cable or video provider may impose a charge or fee to 5    offset any rebates or credits received by the customer and 6    may impose monthly service or maintenance charges, 7    including pay-per-view and premium services charges, 8    during such 30-day period.9    (d) Response to customer inquiries:10        (1) Cable or video providers will maintain a toll-free 11    telephone access line that is available to customers 24 12    hours a day, 7 days a week to accept calls regarding 13    installation, termination, service, and complaints. 14    Trained, knowledgeable, qualified service representatives 15    of the cable or video providers will be available to 16    respond to customer telephone inquiries during normal 17    business hours. Customer service representatives shall be 18    able to provide credit, waive fees, schedule appointments, 19    and change billing cycles. Any difficulties that cannot be 20    resolved by the customer service representatives shall be 21    referred to a supervisor who shall make his or her best 22    efforts to resolve the issue immediately. If the 23    supervisor does not resolve the issue to the customer's 24    satisfaction, the customer shall be informed of the cable 25    or video provider's complaint procedures and procedures 26    for billing dispute resolution and given a description of   SB3222 Engrossed- 13 -LRB104 19119 AAS 32564 b1    the rights and remedies available to customers to enforce 2    the terms of this Article, including the customer's rights 3    to have the complaint reviewed by the local unit of 4    government, to request mediation, and to review in a court 5    of competent jurisdiction.6        (2) After normal business hours, the access line may 7    be answered by a service or an automated response system, 8    including an answering machine. Inquiries received by 9    telephone or e-mail after normal business hours shall be 10    responded to by a trained service representative on the 11    next business day. The cable or video provider shall 12    respond to a written billing inquiry within 10 days of 13    receipt of the inquiry.14        (3) Cable or video providers shall provide customers 15    seeking non-standard installations with a total 16    installation cost estimate and an estimated date of 17    completion. The actual charge to the customer shall not 18    exceed the estimated cost without the written consent of 19    the customer.20        (4) If the cable or video provider receives notice 21    that an unsafe condition exists with respect to its 22    equipment, it shall investigate such condition immediately 23    and shall take such measures as are necessary to remove or 24    eliminate the unsafe condition. The cable or video 25    provider shall inform the local unit of government 26    promptly, but no later than 2 hours after it receives   SB3222 Engrossed- 14 -LRB104 19119 AAS 32564 b1    notification of an unsafe condition that it has not 2    remedied.3        (5) Under normal operating conditions, telephone 4    answer time by the cable or video provider's customer 5    representative, including wait time, shall not exceed 30 6    seconds when the connection is made. If the call needs to 7    be transferred, transfer time shall not exceed 30 seconds. 8    These standards shall be met no less than 90% of the time 9    under normal operating conditions, measured on a quarterly 10    basis. The cable or video provider shall not be required 11    to acquire equipment or perform surveys to measure 12    compliance with these telephone answering standards unless 13    an historical record of complaints indicates a clear 14    failure to comply. 15        (6) Under normal operating conditions, the cable or 16    video provider's customers will receive a busy signal less 17    than 3% of the time.18    (e) Under normal operating conditions, each of the 19following standards related to installations, outages, and 20service calls will be met no less than 95% of the time measured 21on a quarterly basis:22        (1) Standard installations will be performed within 7 23    business days after an order has been placed. "Standard" 24    installations are those that are located up to 125 feet 25    from the existing distribution system.26        (2) Excluding conditions beyond the control of the   SB3222 Engrossed- 15 -LRB104 19119 AAS 32564 b1    cable or video providers, the cable or video providers 2    will begin working on "service interruptions" promptly and 3    in no event later than 24 hours after the interruption is 4    reported by the customer or otherwise becomes known to the 5    cable or video providers. Cable or video providers must 6    begin actions to correct other service problems the next 7    business day after notification of the service problem and 8    correct the problem.9        (3) The "appointment window" alternatives for 10    installations, service calls, and other installation 11    activities will be either a specific time or, at a 12    maximum, a 4-hour time block during evening, weekend, and 13    normal business hours. The cable or video provider may 14    schedule service calls and other installation activities 15    outside of these hours for the express convenience of the 16    customer.17        (4) Cable or video providers may not cancel an 18    appointment with a customer after the close of business on 19    the business day prior to the scheduled appointment. If 20    the cable or video provider's representative is running 21    late for an appointment with a customer and will not be 22    able to keep the appointment as scheduled, the customer 23    will be contacted. The appointment will be rescheduled, as 24    necessary, at a time that is convenient for the customer, 25    even if the rescheduled appointment is not within normal 26    business hours.  SB3222 Engrossed- 16 -LRB104 19119 AAS 32564 b1    (f) Public benefit obligation:2        (1) All cable or video providers offering service 3    pursuant to the Cable and Video Competition Law of 2007, 4    the Illinois Municipal Code, or the Counties Code shall 5    provide a free service line drop and free basic service to 6    all current and future public buildings within their 7    footprint, including, but not limited to, all local unit 8    of government buildings, public libraries, and public 9    primary and secondary schools, whether owned or leased by 10    that local unit of government ("eligible buildings"). Such 11    service shall be used in a manner consistent with the 12    government purpose for the eligible building and shall not 13    be resold.14        (2) This obligation only applies to those cable or 15    video service providers whose cable service or video 16    service systems pass eligible buildings and its cable or 17    video service is generally available to residential 18    subscribers in the same local unit of government in which 19    the eligible building is located. The burden of providing 20    such service at each eligible building shall be shared by 21    all cable and video providers whose systems pass the 22    eligible buildings in an equitable and competitively 23    neutral manner, and nothing herein shall require 24    duplicative installations by more than one cable or video 25    provider at each eligible building. Cable or video 26    providers operating in a local unit of government shall   SB3222 Engrossed- 17 -LRB104 19119 AAS 32564 b1    meet as necessary and determine who will provide service 2    to eligible buildings under this subsection (f). If the 3    cable or video providers are unable to reach an agreement, 4    they shall meet with the local unit of government, which 5    shall determine which cable or video providers will serve 6    each eligible building. The local unit of government shall 7    bear the costs of any inside wiring or video equipment 8    costs not ordinarily provided as part of the cable or 9    video provider's basic offering.10    (g) After the cable or video providers have offered 11service for one year, the cable or video providers shall make 12an annual report to the Commission, to the local unit of 13government, and to the Attorney General that it is meeting the 14standards specified in this Article, identifying the number of 15complaints it received over the prior year in the State and 16specifying the number of complaints related to each of the 17following: (1) billing, charges, refunds, and credits; (2) 18installation or termination of service; (3) quality of service 19and repair; (4) programming; and (5) miscellaneous complaints 20that do not fall within these categories.21    (h) To the extent consistent with federal law, cable or 22video providers shall offer the lowest-cost basic cable or 23video service as a stand-alone service to residential 24customers at reasonable rates. Cable or video providers shall 25not require the subscription to any service other than the 26lowest-cost basic service or to any telecommunications or   SB3222 Engrossed- 18 -LRB104 19119 AAS 32564 b1information service, as a condition of access to cable or 2video service, including programming offered on a per channel 3or per program basis. Cable or video providers shall not 4discriminate between subscribers to the lowest-cost basic 5service, subscribers to other cable services or video 6services, and other subscribers with regard to the rates 7charged for cable or video programming offered on a per 8channel or per program basis.9    (i) To the extent consistent with federal law, cable or 10video providers shall ensure that charges for changes in the 11subscriber's selection of services or equipment shall be based 12on the cost of such change and shall not exceed nominal amounts 13when the system's configuration permits changes in service 14tier selection to be effected solely by coded entry on a 15computer terminal or by other similarly simple method.16    (j) To the extent consistent with federal law, cable or 17video providers shall have a rate structure for the provision 18of cable or video service that is uniform throughout the area 19within the boundaries of the local unit of government. This 20subsection (j) is not intended to prohibit bulk discounts to 21multiple dwelling units or to prohibit reasonable discounts to 22senior citizens or other economically disadvantaged groups.23    (k) To the extent consistent with federal law, cable or 24video providers shall not charge a subscriber for any service 25or equipment that the subscriber has not affirmatively 26requested or affirmatively agreed to by name. For purposes of   SB3222 Engrossed- 19 -LRB104 19119 AAS 32564 b1this subsection (k), a subscriber's failure to refuse a cable 2or video provider's proposal to provide service or equipment 3shall not be deemed to be an affirmative request for such 4service or equipment.5    (l) No contract or service agreement containing an early 6termination clause offering residential cable or video 7services or any bundle including such services shall be for a 8term longer than 2 years. Any contract or service offering 9with a term of service that contains an early termination fee 10shall limit the early termination fee to not more than the 11value of any additional goods or services provided with the 12cable or video services, the amount of the discount reflected 13in the price for cable services or video services for the 14period during which the consumer benefited from the discount, 15or a declining fee based on the remainder of the contract term.16    (m) Cable or video providers shall not discriminate in the 17provision of services for the hearing and visually impaired, 18and shall comply with the accessibility requirements of 47 19U.S.C. 613. Cable or video providers shall deliver and pick-up 20or provide customers with pre-paid shipping and packaging for 21the return of converters and other necessary equipment at the 22home of customers with disabilities. Cable or video providers 23shall provide free use of a converter or remote control unit to 24mobility impaired customers.25    (n)(1) To the extent consistent with federal law, cable or 26video providers shall comply with the provisions of 47 U.S.C.   SB3222 Engrossed- 20 -LRB104 19119 AAS 32564 b1532(h) and (j). The cable or video providers shall not 2exercise any editorial control over any video programming 3provided pursuant to this Section, or in any other way 4consider the content of such programming, except that a cable 5or video provider may refuse to transmit any leased access 6program or portion of a leased access program that contains 7obscenity, indecency, or nudity and may consider such content 8to the minimum extent necessary to establish a reasonable 9price for the commercial use of designated channel capacity by 10an unaffiliated person. This subsection (n) shall permit cable 11or video providers to enforce prospectively a written and 12published policy of prohibiting programming that the cable or 13video provider reasonably believes describes or depicts sexual 14or excretory activities or organs in a patently offensive 15manner as measured by contemporary community standards.16        (2) Upon customer request, the cable or video provider 17    shall, without charge, fully scramble or otherwise fully 18    block the audio and video programming of each channel 19    carrying such programming so that a person who is not a 20    subscriber does not receive the channel or programming.21        (3) In providing sexually explicit adult programming 22    or other programming that is indecent on any channel of 23    its service primarily dedicated to sexually oriented 24    programming, the cable or video provider shall fully 25    scramble or otherwise fully block the video and audio 26    portion of such channel so that a person who is not a   SB3222 Engrossed- 21 -LRB104 19119 AAS 32564 b1    subscriber to such channel or programming does not receive 2    it.3        (4) Scramble means to rearrange the content of the 4    signal of the programming so that the programming cannot 5    be viewed or heard in an understandable manner.6    (o) Cable or video providers will maintain a listing, 7specific to the level of street address, of the areas where its 8cable or video services are available. Customers who inquire 9about purchasing cable or video service shall be informed 10about whether the cable or video provider's cable or video 11services are currently available to them at their specific 12location.13    (p) Cable or video providers shall not disclose the name, 14address, telephone number or other personally identifying 15information of a cable service or video service customer to be 16used in mailing lists or to be used for other commercial 17purposes not reasonably related to the conduct of its business 18unless the cable or video provider has provided to the 19customer a notice, separately or included in any other 20customer service notice, that clearly and conspicuously 21describes the customer's ability to prohibit the disclosure. 22Cable or video providers shall provide an address and 23telephone number for a customer to use without a toll charge to 24prevent disclosure of the customer's name and address in 25mailing lists or for other commercial purposes not reasonably 26related to the conduct of its business to other businesses or   SB3222 Engrossed- 22 -LRB104 19119 AAS 32564 b1affiliates of the cable or video provider. Cable or video 2providers shall comply with the consumer privacy requirements 3of Section 26-4.5 of the Criminal Code of 2012, the Restricted 4Call Registry Act, and 47 U.S.C. 551 that are in effect as of 5June 30, 2007 (the effective date of Public Act 95-9) and as 6amended thereafter.7    (q) Cable or video providers shall implement an informal 8process for handling inquiries from local units of government 9and customers concerning billing issues, service issues, 10privacy concerns, and other consumer complaints. In the event 11that an issue is not resolved through this informal process, a 12local unit of government or the customer may request 13nonbinding mediation with the cable or video provider, with 14each party to bear its own costs of such mediation. Selection 15of the mediator will be by mutual agreement, and preference 16will be given to mediation services that do not charge the 17consumer for their services. In the event that the informal 18process does not produce a satisfactory result to the customer 19or the local unit of government, enforcement may be pursued as 20provided in subdivision (4) of subsection (r) of this Section.21    (r) The Attorney General and the local unit of government 22may enforce all of the customer service and privacy protection 23standards of this Section with respect to complaints received 24from residents within the local unit of government's 25jurisdiction, but it may not adopt or seek to enforce any 26additional or different customer service or performance   SB3222 Engrossed- 23 -LRB104 19119 AAS 32564 b1standards under any other authority or provision of law.2        (1) The local unit of government may, by ordinance, 3    provide a schedule of penalties for any material breach of 4    this Section by cable or video providers in addition to 5    the penalties provided herein. No monetary penalties shall 6    be assessed for a material breach if it is out of the 7    reasonable control of the cable or video providers or its 8    affiliate. Monetary penalties adopted in an ordinance 9    pursuant to this Section shall apply on a competitively 10    neutral basis to all providers of cable service or video 11    service within the local unit of government's 12    jurisdiction. In no event shall the penalties imposed 13    under this subsection (r) exceed $750 for each day of the 14    material breach, and these penalties shall not exceed 15    $25,000 for each occurrence of a material breach per 16    customer.17        (2) For purposes of this Section, "material breach" 18    means any substantial failure of a cable or video service 19    provider to comply with service quality and other 20    standards specified in any provision of this Act. The 21    Attorney General or the local unit of government shall 22    give the cable or video provider written notice of any 23    alleged material breaches of this Act and allow such 24    provider at least 30 days from receipt of the notice to 25    remedy the specified material breach.26        (3) A material breach, for the purposes of assessing   SB3222 Engrossed- 24 -LRB104 19119 AAS 32564 b1    penalties, shall be deemed to have occurred for each day 2    that a material breach has not been remedied by the cable 3    service or video service provider after the expiration of 4    the period specified in subdivision (2) of this subsection 5    (r) in each local unit of government's jurisdiction, 6    irrespective of the number of customers affected.7        (4) Any customer, the Attorney General, or a local 8    unit of government may pursue alleged violations of this 9    Act by the cable or video provider in a court of competent 10    jurisdiction. A cable or video provider may seek judicial 11    review of a decision of a local unit of government 12    imposing penalties in a court of competent jurisdiction. 13    No local unit of government shall be subject to suit for 14    damages or other relief based upon its action in 15    connection with its enforcement or review of any of the 16    terms, conditions, and rights contained in this Act except 17    a court may require the return of any penalty it finds was 18    not properly assessed or imposed.19    (s) Cable or video providers shall credit customers for 20violations in the amounts stated herein. The credits shall be 21applied on the statement issued to the customer for the next 22monthly billing cycle following the violation or following the 23discovery of the violation. Cable or video providers are 24responsible for providing the credits described herein and the 25customer is under no obligation to request the credit. If the 26customer is no longer taking service from the cable or video   SB3222 Engrossed- 25 -LRB104 19119 AAS 32564 b1provider, the credit amount will be refunded to the customer 2by check within 30 days of the termination of service. A local 3unit of government may, by ordinance, adopt a schedule of 4credits payable directly to customers for breach of the 5customer service standards and obligations contained in this 6Article, provided the schedule of customer credits applies on 7a competitively neutral basis to all providers of cable 8service or video service in the local unit of government's 9jurisdiction and the credits are not greater than the credits 10provided in this Section.11        (1) Failure to keep an appointment or to notify the 12    customer prior to the close of business on the business 13    day prior to the scheduled appointment: $25.00.14        (2) Violation of customer service and billing 15    standards in subsections (c) and (d) of this Section: 16    $25.00 per occurrence.17        (3) Violation of the bundling rules in subsection (h) 18    of this Section: $25.00 per month.19    (t) The enforcement powers granted to the Attorney General 20in Article XXI of this Act shall apply to this Article, except 21that the Attorney General may not seek penalties for violation 22of this Article other than in the amounts specified herein. 23Nothing in this Section shall limit or affect the powers of the 24Attorney General to enforce the provisions of Article XXI of 25this Act or the Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business 26Practices Act.  SB3222 Engrossed- 26 -LRB104 19119 AAS 32564 b1    (u) This Article applies to all cable and video providers 2in the State, including but not limited to those operating 3under a local franchise as that term is used in 47 U.S.C. 4522(9), those operating under authorization pursuant to 5Section 11-42-11 of the Illinois Municipal Code, those 6operating under authorization pursuant to Section 5-1095 of 7the Counties Code, and those operating under a State-issued 8authorization pursuant to Article XXI of this Act. 9(Source: P.A. 97-1108, eff. 1-1-13; 97-1150, eff. 1-25-13; 1098-45, eff. 6-28-13.) 11    (220 ILCS 5/22-504 new)12    Sec. 22-504. Volume of commercial advertisements.13    (a) On and after July 1, 2027, a video streaming service or 14third-party advertising manager that serves consumers residing 15in the State shall exercise reasonable care in normalizing the 16audio of short-form content so that the audio is not 17transmitted at a louder volume than the audio of the 18accompanying long-form content, consistent with the 19regulations adopted by the Federal Communications Commission 20pursuant to the Commercial Advertisement Loudness Mitigation 21(CALM) Act (Public Law 111-311) for television broadcast 22stations, cable operators, and other video programming 23distributors. There shall be a rebuttable presumption that a 24video streaming service or third-party advertising manager 25that maintains processes to require that the audio of   SB3222 Engrossed- 27 -LRB104 19119 AAS 32564 b1short-form content not be louder than the audio of the 2accompanying long-form content that are similar to processes 3employed by the video streaming service or third-party 4advertising manager to comply with the CALM Act (Public Law 5111-311) is exercising reasonable care.6    (b) A video streaming service or third-party advertising 7manager that engages in normalization shall be deemed in 8compliance with this Section.9    (c) A video streaming service that engages a third-party 10advertising manager to solely control the loudness of the 11audio of short-form content on the video streaming service 12shall not be liable under subsection (a) for short-form 13content distributed by the third-party advertising manager on 14the video streaming service if the video streaming service 15enters into a written agreement with the third-party 16advertising manager that requires the audio of short-form 17content distributed by the third-party advertising manager to 18not be louder than the target loudness of the audio of the 19accompanying long-form content distributed by the video 20streaming service, consistent with established industry 21standards.22    (d) This Section does not create a private right of 23action. The Attorney General shall have exclusive authority to 24enforce the provisions of this Section.25    (e) For purposes of this Section, the distribution of an 26individually identifiable piece of short-form content within a   SB3222 Engrossed- 28 -LRB104 19119 AAS 32564 b130-day period after the first distribution of the content in 2violation of this Section constitutes a single violation, 3regardless of how many individual consumers receive a 4transmission of such content.5    (f) Before initiating any action under this Section, the 6Attorney General shall provide a video streaming service or 7third-party advertising manager written notice of an alleged 8violation. If, within 45 days after receipt of the notice, the 9video streaming service or third-party advertising manager 10cures the alleged violation by either (i) ceasing to 11distribute the individually identifiable piece of short-form 12content or (ii) normalizing the audio of the individually 13identifiable piece of short-form content for all subsequent 14distributions of the content, the video streaming service or 15third-party advertising manager shall not be liable for the 16alleged violation cured pursuant to this Section.